src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VINIT_aniibiish_gt-norm.yaml
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishenyishinaanibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishenyishinaanibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaniibiishenyishinaanidig, gidaniibiishenyishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaniibiishenyishinaanidig, gidaniibiishenyishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaniibiishenyishinaanidig, gidaniibiishenyishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishenyishiwaabaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishenyishiwaabaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishenyishiwaabaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gidaniibiishenyishiwaadig, gidaniibiishenyishiwaadog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gidaniibiishenyishiwaadig, gidaniibiishenyishiwaadog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gidaniibiishenyishiwaadig, gidaniibiishenyishiwaadog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishensishinaanibaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishensishinaanibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishensishinaanibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaniibiishensishinaanidig, gidaniibiishensishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaniibiishensishinaanidig, gidaniibiishensishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaniibiishensishinaanidig, gidaniibiishensishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishensishiwaabaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishensishiwaabaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishensishiwaabaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gidaniibiishensishiwaadig, gidaniibiishensishiwaadog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gidaniibiishensishiwaadig, gidaniibiishensishiwaadog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gidaniibiishensishiwaadig, gidaniibiishensishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishenyishiniibaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishenyishiniibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishenyishiniibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaniibiishenyishiniidig, odaniibiishenyishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaniibiishenyishiniidig, odaniibiishenyishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaniibiishenyishiniidig, odaniibiishenyishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishenyishiwaabaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishenyishiwaabaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishenyishiwaabaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaniibiishenyishiwaadig, odaniibiishenyishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [odaniibiishenyishiwaadig, odaniibiishenyishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [odaniibiishenyishiwaadig, odaniibiishenyishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishensishiniibaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishensishiniibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishensishiniibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaniibiishensishiniidig, odaniibiishensishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaniibiishensishiniidig, odaniibiishensishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaniibiishensishiniidig, odaniibiishensishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishensishiwaabaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishensishiwaabaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishensishiwaabaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaniibiishensishiwaadig, odaniibiishensishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [odaniibiishensishiwaadig, odaniibiishensishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [odaniibiishensishiwaadig, odaniibiishensishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nidaniibiishimishinaanibaniing
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nidaniibiishimishinaanibaniin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nidaniibiishimishinaanibaniin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nidaniibiishimishinaanidig, nidaniibiishimishinaanidog]
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nidaniibiishimishinaanidig, nidaniibiishimishinaanidog]
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nidaniibiishimishinaanidig, nidaniibiishimishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishimishinaanibaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishimishinaanibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishimishinaanibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaniibiishimishinaanidig, gidaniibiishimishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaniibiishimishinaanidig, gidaniibiishimishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaniibiishimishinaanidig, gidaniibiishimishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishimishiwaabaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishimishiwaabaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishimishiwaabaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gidaniibiishimishiwaadig, gidaniibiishimishiwaadog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gidaniibiishimishiwaadig, gidaniibiishimishiwaadog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gidaniibiishimishiwaadig, gidaniibiishimishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishimishiniibaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishimishiniibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishimishiniibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaniibiishimishiniidig, odaniibiishimishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaniibiishimishiniidig, odaniibiishimishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaniibiishimishiniidig, odaniibiishimishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishimishiwaabaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishimishiwaabaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishimishiwaabaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaniibiishimishiwaadig, odaniibiishimishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [odaniibiishimishiwaadig, odaniibiishimishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [odaniibiishimishiwaadig, odaniibiishimishiwaadog]
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nidaniibiishenyimishinaanibaniing
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nidaniibiishenyimishinaanibaniin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nidaniibiishenyimishinaanibaniin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nidaniibiishenyimishinaanidig, nidaniibiishenyimishinaanidog]
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nidaniibiishenyimishinaanidig, nidaniibiishenyimishinaanidog]
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nidaniibiishenyimishinaanidig, nidaniibiishenyimishinaanidog]
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nidaniibiishensimishinaanibaniing
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nidaniibiishensimishinaanibaniin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nidaniibiishensimishinaanibaniin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nidaniibiishensimishinaanidig, nidaniibiishensimishinaanidog]
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nidaniibiishensimishinaanidig, nidaniibiishensimishinaanidog]
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nidaniibiishensimishinaanidig, nidaniibiishensimishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishenyimishinaanibaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishenyimishinaanibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishenyimishinaanibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaniibiishenyimishinaanidig, gidaniibiishenyimishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaniibiishenyimishinaanidig, gidaniibiishenyimishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaniibiishenyimishinaanidig, gidaniibiishenyimishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishenyimishiwaabaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishenyimishiwaabaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishenyimishiwaabaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gidaniibiishenyimishiwaadig, gidaniibiishenyimishiwaadog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gidaniibiishenyimishiwaadig, gidaniibiishenyimishiwaadog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gidaniibiishenyimishiwaadig, gidaniibiishenyimishiwaadog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishensimishinaanibaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishensimishinaanibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishensimishinaanibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaniibiishensimishinaanidig, gidaniibiishensimishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaniibiishensimishinaanidig, gidaniibiishensimishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaniibiishensimishinaanidig, gidaniibiishensimishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishensimishiwaabaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishensimishiwaabaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishensimishiwaabaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gidaniibiishensimishiwaadig, gidaniibiishensimishiwaadog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gidaniibiishensimishiwaadig, gidaniibiishensimishiwaadog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gidaniibiishensimishiwaadig, gidaniibiishensimishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishenyimishiniibaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishenyimishiniibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishenyimishiniibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaniibiishenyimishiniidig, odaniibiishenyimishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaniibiishenyimishiniidig, odaniibiishenyimishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaniibiishenyimishiniidig, odaniibiishenyimishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishenyimishiwaabaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishenyimishiwaabaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishenyimishiwaabaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaniibiishenyimishiwaadig, odaniibiishenyimishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [odaniibiishenyimishiwaadig, odaniibiishenyimishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [odaniibiishenyimishiwaadig, odaniibiishenyimishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishensimishiniibaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishensimishiniibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishensimishiniibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaniibiishensimishiniidig, odaniibiishensimishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaniibiishensimishiniidig, odaniibiishensimishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaniibiishensimishiniidig, odaniibiishensimishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishensimishiwaabaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishensimishiwaabaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishensimishiwaabaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaniibiishensimishiwaadig, odaniibiishensimishiwaadog]
